Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2657.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5609HV (1) 91 sb/js H.F. 2657 Section 1. Section 422.20, subsection 3, paragraph a, Code 1 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 a. Unless otherwise expressly permitted by section 8G.4 , 3 section 11.41 , section 96.11, subsection 6 , section 421.17, 4 subsections 22, 23, and 26 , section 421.17, subsection 27 , 5 paragraph âkâ , section 421.17, subsection 31 , section 252B.9 , 6 section 321.40, subsection 6 , sections 321.120 , 421.19 , 421.28 , 7 421.59 , 421.65 , 422.72 , 452A.63 , section 483A.1A, subsection 8 10, paragraph âgâ , and section 556.19, subsection 2 , this 9 section , or another provision of law, a tax return, return 10 information, or investigative or audit information shall not 11 be divulged to any person or entity, other than the taxpayer, 12 the department, or internal revenue service for use in a matter 13 unrelated to tax administration. 14 Sec. 2. Section 422.72, subsection 3, paragraph a, Code 15 2026, is amended to read as follows: 16 a. Unless otherwise expressly permitted by section 8G.4 , 17 section 11.41 , section 96.11, subsection 6 , section 421.17, 18 subsections 22, 23, and 26 , section 421.17, subsection 27 , 19 paragraph âkâ , section 421.17, subsection 31 , section 252B.9 , 20 section 321.40, subsection 6 , sections 321.120 , 421.19 , 421.28 , 21 421.65 , 422.20 , 452A.63 , section 483A.1A, subsection 10, 22 paragraph âgâ , and section 556.19, subsection 2 , this section , 23 or another provision of law, a tax return, return information, 24 or investigative or audit information shall not be divulged to 25 any person or entity, other than the taxpayer, the department, 26 or internal revenue service for use in a matter unrelated to 27 tax administration. 28 Sec. 3. Section 483A.1A, subsection 10, Code 2026, is 29 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 30 NEW PARAGRAPH . g. Is or was required to file a tax 31 return in the state of Iowa for the previous tax year. The 32 department of revenue shall assist the department in verifying 33 this information. The department of revenue shall provide no 34 additional information other than the information necessary to 35 -1- LSB 5609HV (1) 91 sb/js 1/ 2 H.F. 2657 confirm the tax status required under this paragraph. 1